Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,163
Alcoholic liquor; prohibited operation; effect.

No person shall operate or be in the actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having any alcoholic liquor in his or her body. Any person who operates or is in the actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having any alcoholic liquor in his or her body or who refuses to submit to a test or tests to determine the alcoholic content of his or her blood or breath shall be placed out of service for twenty-four hours, shall be subject to disqualification as provided in sections 60-4,167 and 60-4,168, and shall be subject to prosecution for any violation of sections 60-6,196 and 60-6,197.

Any order to place a person out of service for twenty-four hours issued by a law enforcement officer shall be made pursuant to 49 C.F.R. 392.5(c) adopted pursuant to section 75-363.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 113;

Laws 1993, LB 191, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 91;

Laws 2001, LB 773, § 12;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 9.